Illinois, session 104th, SB1659.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 11-1 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/11-1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 11-1)7    Sec. 11-1. In counties not under township organization, 8the election precincts shall remain as now established until 9changed by the Board of County Commissioners, but said County 10Board may, from time to time, change the boundaries of 11election precincts and establish new ones. In counties under 12township organization, an election authority may combine a 13township with another township to constitute one election 14precinct if the townships are contiguous and 2 or more of the 15following conditions are satisfied:16        (1) the election authority certifies to the State 17    Board of Elections that the townships have been combined 18    into one election precinct for the 2 preceding general 19    elections;20        (2) there are no more than 1,800 registered voters in 21    the townships combined;22        (3) there are no more than 500 registered voters in a 23    precinct within either township; or  SB1659- 2 -LRB104 10411 SPS 20486 b1        (4) the majority of the board of township trustees for 2    both townships vote to combine the townships into one 3    election precinct and inform the election authority of 4    that decision.5    The election authority shall consider voter convenience 6and election integrity when determining whether to combine a 7township with another township to constitute one election 8precinct. In counties under township organization, each town 9shall constitute at least one election precinct.10     Insofar as is practicable, each precinct shall be 11situated within a single congressional, legislative and 12representative district and within a single municipal ward. In 13order to situate each precinct within a single district or 14ward, the County Board shall change the boundaries of election 15precincts after each decennial census as soon as is 16practicable following the completion of congressional and 17legislative redistricting.18    At any consolidated primary or consolidated election at 19which municipal officers are to be elected, and at any 20emergency referendum at which a public question relating to a 21municipality is to be voted on, notwithstanding any other 22provision of this Code, the election authority shall establish 23a polling place within such municipality upon the request of 24the municipal council or board of trustees at least 60 days 25before the election and provided that the municipality 26provides a suitable polling place. To accomplish this purpose,   SB1659- 3 -LRB104 10411 SPS 20486 b1the election authority may establish an election precinct 2constituting a single municipality of under 500 population for 3all elections, notwithstanding the minimum precinct size 4otherwise specified herein.5    Notwithstanding the above, when there are not more than 50 6registered voters in a precinct who are entitled to vote in a 7local government or school district election, the election 8authority having jurisdiction over the precinct is authorized 9to reassign such voters to one or more polling places in 10adjacent precincts, within or without the election authority's 11jurisdiction, for that election. For the purposes of such 12local government or school district election only, the votes 13of the reassigned voters shall be tallied and canvassed as 14votes from the precinct of the polling place to which such 15voters have been reassigned. The election authority having 16jurisdiction over the precinct shall approve all 17administrative and polling place procedures. Such procedures 18shall take into account voter convenience, and ensure that the 19integrity of the election process is maintained and that the 20secrecy of the ballot is not violated.21    Except in the event of a fire, flood or total loss of heat 22in a place fixed or established by any election authority 23pursuant to this Section as a polling place for an election, no 24election authority shall change the location of a polling 25place so established for any precinct after notice of the 26place of holding the election for that precinct has been given   SB1659- 4 -LRB104 10411 SPS 20486 b1as required under Article 12 unless the election authority 2notifies all registered voters in the precinct of the change 3in location by first class mail in sufficient time for such 4notice to be received by the registered voters in the precinct 5at least one day prior to the date of the election.6    The provisions of this Section apply to all precincts, 7including those where voting machines or electronic voting 8systems are used.9    If, as a result of the redistricting of legislative, 10representative, or congressional districts following a 11decennial census, there exists a census block with only one 12voter that is the only census block in a precinct that is in a 13legislative, representative, or congressional district, then 14the county board, at any meeting of the county board, may 15change the precinct boundaries so that the census block is 16within a precinct that has more than one voter in the 17legislative, representative, or congressional district.18(Source: P.A. 88-525.)